Nevada, session 83, AB59.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 501.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.005 [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 501.382, “big]
“Big game mammal” means any game mammal so classified by
Commission regulation.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. NRS 501.181 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.181 The Commission shall:
1. Establish broad policies for:
(a) The protection, propagation, restoration, transplanting,
introduction and management of wildlife in this State.
(b) The promotion of the safety of persons using or property
used in the operation of vessels on the waters of this State.
(c) The promotion of uniformity of laws relating to policy
matters.
2. Guide the Department in its administration and enforcement
of the provisions of this title and of chapter 488 of NRS by the
establishment of such policies.
3. Establish policies for areas of interest including:
(a) The management of big and small game mammals, upland
and migratory game birds, fur-bearing mammals, game fish, and
protected and unprotected mammals, birds, fish, reptiles and
amphibians.
(b) The management and control of predatory wildlife.
(c) The acquisition of lands, water rights and easements and
other property for the management, propagation, protection and
restoration of wildlife.
(d) The entry, access to, and occupancy and use of such
property, including leases of grazing rights, sales of agricultural
products and requests by the Director to the State Land Registrar for
the sale of timber if the sale does not interfere with the use of the
property on which the timber is located for wildlife management or
for hunting or fishing thereon.
(e) The control of nonresident hunters.
(f) The introduction, transplanting or exporting of wildlife.
(g) Cooperation with federal, state and local agencies on wildlife
and boating programs.
(h) The revocation of licenses issued pursuant to this title to any
person who is convicted of a violation of any provision of this title
or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.
4. Establish regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of
this title and of chapter 488 of NRS, including:
(a) Seasons for hunting game mammals and game birds, for
hunting or trapping fur-bearing mammals and for fishing, the daily
and possession limits, the manner and means of taking wildlife,
including, but not limited to, the sex, size or other physical
differentiation for each species, and, when necessary for
management purposes, the emergency closing or extending of a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
season, reducing or increasing of the bag or possession limits on a
species, or the closing of any area to hunting, fishing or trapping. If,
in establishing any regulations pursuant to this subsection, the
Commission rejects the recommendations of a county advisory
board to manage wildlife with regard to the length of seasons for
fishing, hunting and trapping or the bag or possession limits
applicable within the respective county, the Commission shall
provide to the county advisory board to manage wildlife at the
meeting an explanation of the Commission’s decision to reject the
recommendations and, as soon as practicable after the meeting, a
written explanation of the Commission’s decision to reject the
recommendations. Any regulations relating to the closure of a
season must be based upon scientific data concerning the
management of wildlife. The data upon which the regulations are
based must be collected or developed by the Department.
(b) The manner of using, attaching, filling out, punching,
inspecting, validating or reporting tags.
(c) The delineation of game management units embracing
contiguous territory located in more than one county, irrespective of
county boundary lines.
(d) The number of licenses issued for big game and, if
necessary, other game species.
5. Adopt regulations requiring the Department to make public,
before official delivery, its proposed responses to any requests by
federal agencies for its comment on drafts of statements concerning
the environmental effect of proposed actions or regulations affecting
public lands.
6. Adopt regulations:
(a) Governing the provisions of the permit required by NRS
502.390 and for the issuance, renewal and revocation of such a
permit.
(b) Establishing the method for determining the amount of an
assessment, and the time and manner of payment, necessary for the
collection of the assessment required by NRS 502.390.
7. [Designate those portions of wildlife management areas for
big game mammals that are of special concern for the regulation of
the importation, possession and propagation of alternative livestock
pursuant to NRS 576.129.
8.] Adopt regulations governing the trapping of fur-bearing
mammals in a residential area of a county whose population is
100,000 or more.
[9.] 8. Adopt regulations prescribing the circumstances under
which a person, regardless of whether the person has obtained a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
valid tag issued by the Department, may assist in the killing and
retrieval of a wounded big game mammal by another person who:
(a) Is a paraplegic, has had one or both legs amputated or has
suffered a paralysis of one or both legs which severely impedes the
person’s walking; and
(b) Has obtained a valid tag issued by the Department for
hunting that animal.
[10.] 9. In establishing any policy or adopting any regulations
pursuant to this section, first consider the recommendations of the
Department, the county advisory boards to manage wildlife and
other persons who present their views at an open meeting of the
Commission.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. NRS 501.376 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.376 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
person shall not intentionally kill or aid and abet another person to
kill a bighorn sheep, mountain goat, elk, deer, moose, pronghorn
antelope, mountain lion or black bear:
(a) Outside of the prescribed season set by the Commission for
the lawful hunting of that animal;
(b) Through the use of a manned or unmanned aircraft or
helicopter in violation of NRS 503.010;
(c) By a method other than the method prescribed on the tag
issued by the Department for hunting that animal;
(d) Knowingly during a time other than:
(1) The time of day set by the Commission for hunting that
animal pursuant to NRS 503.140; or
(2) If the Commission has not set such a time, between
sunrise and sunset as determined pursuant to that section; or
(e) Without a valid tag issued by the Department for hunting
that animal. A tag issued for hunting any animal specified in this
subsection is not valid if knowingly used by a person:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by the regulations adopted
by the Commission pursuant to subsection [9] 8 of NRS 501.181,
other than the person specified on the tag;
(2) Outside of the management area or other area specified
on the tag; or
(3) If the tag was obtained by a false or fraudulent
representation.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not prohibit the killing of
an animal specified in subsection 1 if:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(a) The killing of the animal is necessary to protect the life of
any person, pet or livestock in imminent danger of being attacked by
the animal; or
(b) The animal killed was not the intended target of the person
who killed the animal and the killing of the animal which was the
intended target would not violate the provisions of subsection 1.
3. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 1 shall
be punished for a category E felony as provided in NRS 193.130 or,
if the court reduces the penalty pursuant to this subsection, for a
gross misdemeanor. In determining whether to reduce the penalty,
the court shall consider:
(a) The nature of the offense;
(b) The circumstances surrounding the offense;
(c) The defendant’s understanding and appreciation of the
gravity of the offense;
(d) The attitude of the defendant towards the offense; and
(e) The general objectives of sentencing.
4. A person shall not willfully possess any animal specified in
subsection 1 if the person knows the animal was killed in violation
of subsection 1 or the circumstances should have caused a
reasonable person to know that the animal was killed in violation of
subsection 1.
5. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 4 is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Livestock” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 561.025.
(b) “Pet” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 202.487.
Sec. 6. NRS 501.379 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.379 1. [Except as otherwise provided in this section:
(a)] It is unlawful for any person to sell or expose for sale, to
barter, trade or purchase or to attempt to sell, barter, trade or
purchase any species of wildlife, or parts thereof, except as
otherwise provided in this title or in a regulation of the Commission.
[(b)] 2. The importation and sale of products made from the
meat of game mammals, game birds or game amphibians raised in
captivity is not prohibited if the importation is from a licensed
commercial breeder or commercial processor.
[2. The provisions of this section do not apply to alternative
livestock and products made therefrom.]
Sec. 7. NRS 501.382 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.382 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
person shall not [intentionally] :
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(a) Intentionally feed any [big game mammal] wildlife
classified as a wild mammal by Commission regulation; or
(b) Take any bird classified as a game bird by Commission
regulation:
(1) By baiting such a game bird; or
(2) On or above an area that has been baited which the
person knows or reasonably should have known has been baited,
 without written authorization from the Department.
2. A person who violates subsection 1:
(a) For a first offense, must not be cited or charged criminally
but must be informed, in writing, of the behavior that constitutes the
violation and the penalties prescribed by this section for any
subsequent violation of this section.
(b) For a second offense, shall be punished by a fine of not more
than $250.
(c) For a third or subsequent offense, shall be punished by a fine
of not more than $500.
3. The provisions of this section do not apply to any employee
or agent of the Department or the Animal and Plant Health
Inspection Service of the United States Department of Agriculture
who, while carrying out his or her duties, intentionally feeds [a big
game mammal] wildlife classified as a wild mammal by
Commission regulation or takes any bird classified as a game bird
by Commission regulation in violation of subsection 1 for any
purpose.
4. As used in this section:
(a) [“Big game mammal” means:
(1) Any pronghorn antelope, black bear, mule deer, mountain
goat, mountain lion or Rocky Mountain elk; or
(2) Any of the following subspecies of bighorn sheep:
(I) Nelson bighorn sheep;
(II) California bighorn sheep; or
(III) Rocky Mountain bighorn sheep.]
“Baiting” means the intentional placing, exposing, depositing,
distributing or scattering of salt, grain, minerals or any other form
of nourishment, with the intent to attract, entice or lure a bird
classified as a game bird by Commission regulation. The term
does not include any incidental or unintentional feeding of such a
game bird.
(b) “Intentionally feed” means to supply, provide or otherwise
make available any salt, grain, meat or other form of nourishment
with the intent to attract or feed [a big game mammal.] wildlife
classified as a wild mammal by Commission regulation. The term
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
does not include any incidental or unintentional feeding of [a big
game mammal,] such wildlife, including, without limitation, any
such feeding associated with:
(1) Any accepted agricultural or livestock practice;
(2) Any planting or maintenance of any shrub, tree or other
landscaping for any residence, property or area; or
(3) Any sporting event or outdoor activity at which food is
served or consumed.
Sec. 8. NRS 501.3845 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.3845 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is
unlawful for a person or any agent or employee of a person to
knowingly:
(a) Bring into this State the carcass or any part of the carcass or
any excrement or bodily fluid of any of the following animals
which were obtained in another state, territory or country:
(1) An elk (Cervus elaphus);
(2) A mule deer (Odocoileus hemionus);
(3) A white-tailed deer (Odocoileus virginianus);
(4) A moose (Alces alces);
(5) Any alternative livestock; or
(6) Any other animal which the State Quarantine Officer has,
by regulation, declared to be susceptible to chronic wasting disease
and prohibited from importation into this State; or
(b) Possess any carcass or part of the carcass or excrement or
bodily fluid of any elk, deer, moose, alternative livestock or other
animal brought into this State in violation of paragraph (a).
2. A person or any agent or employee of a person may bring
into this State the following parts of the carcass of any elk, deer,
moose, alternative livestock or other animal specified in
subsection 1:
(a) The meat of the elk, deer, moose, alternative livestock or
other animal with no part of the spinal column, brain tissue or head
attached, except that one or more bones of the legs or shoulders may
be attached.
(b) The hide or cape of the elk, deer, moose, alternative
livestock or other animal with no part of the spinal column, brain
tissue or head attached.
(c) The clean skull plate of the elk, deer, moose, alternative
livestock or other animal with antlers attached and no part of the
brain tissue attached.
(d) The antlers of the elk, deer, moose, alternative livestock or
other animal with no meat or tissue other than antler velvet attached.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(e) The taxidermy mount of the elk, deer, moose, alternative
livestock or other animal with no meat or tissue other than antler
velvet attached.
(f) The upper canine teeth of the elk, deer, moose, alternative
livestock or other animal, including, without limitation, the bugler,
whistler and ivory teeth.
3. Any carcass or part of the carcass or excrement or bodily
fluid of an elk, deer, moose, alternative livestock or other animal
knowingly brought into this State or knowingly possessed in this
State in violation of this section may be seized, destroyed or sent out
of this State by a game warden or any other law enforcement officer
within 48 hours. The expense of seizing, destroying or removing the
carcass or part of the carcass or excrement or bodily fluid must be
paid by the person or his or her agent or employee who knowingly
brought the carcass or part of the carcass or excrement or bodily
fluid into this State or knowingly possessed the carcass or part of
the carcass or excrement or bodily fluid in this State.
Sec. 9. NRS 501.3855 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.3855 1. In addition to the penalties provided for the
violation of any of the provisions of this title, every person who:
(a) Unlawfully kills or possesses a trophy big game mammal is
liable for a civil penalty of not less than $5,000 nor more than
$30,000; or
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a) or NRS
503.610, unlawfully kills or possesses a big game mammal,
[moose,] bobcat, swan or eagle is liable for a civil penalty of not less
than $250 but less than $5,000.
2. For the unlawful killing or possession of fish or wildlife not
included in subsection 1, a person is liable for a civil penalty of not
less than $25 nor more than $1,000.
3. For hunting, fishing or trapping without a valid license, tag
or permit, a person is liable for a civil penalty of not less than $50
nor more than the amount of the fee for the license, tag or permit
required for the activity in which the person engaged.
4. Every court, before whom a defendant is convicted of
unlawfully killing or possessing any wildlife, shall order the
defendant to pay the civil penalty in the amount stated in this section
for each mammal, bird or fish unlawfully killed or possessed. The
court shall fix the manner and time of payment.
5. The Department may attempt to collect all penalties and
installments that are in default in any manner provided by law for
the enforcement of a judgment.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
6. If a person who is ordered to pay a civil penalty pursuant to
this section fails to do so within 90 days after the date set forth in
the order, the Department may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or
renew any license, tag, permit, certificate or other document or
privilege otherwise available to the person pursuant to this title
or chapter 488 of NRS.
7. Each court that receives money pursuant to the provisions of
this section shall forthwith remit the money to the Department
which shall deposit the money with the State Treasurer for credit to
the Wildlife Account in the State General Fund.
8. As used in this section, “trophy big game mammal” means a
mule deer with an outside antler measurement of at least 24 inches,
a bighorn sheep of any species with at least one horn exceeding a
half curl, a Rocky Mountain elk with at least six antler points on one
antler, a pronghorn antelope with at least one horn which is more
than 14 inches in length, a moose, a mountain goat or a black bear.
As used in this subsection:
(a) “Antler” means any bony growth originating from the
pedicle portion of the skull of a big game mammal that is annually
cast and regenerated as part of the annual life cycle of the big game
mammal.
(b) “Antler point” means a projection which is at least 1 inch in
length with the length exceeding the width of its base . [, excluding]
The term does not include the first point on the main beam ,
commonly known as the eye guard , on mule deer.
(c) “Horn exceeding a half curl” means a horn tip that has grown
at least through 180 degrees of a circle determined by establishing a
parallel reference line from the base of the horn and measuring the
horn tip to determine whether the horn tip has grown at least to the
projection of the reference line.
(d) “Outside antler measurement” means the perpendicular
measurement at right angles to the center line of the skull of a deer
at the widest point between the main antler beams or the antler
points off the main antler beams.
Sec. 10. NRS 502.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.140 1. Tags may be used as a method of enforcing a
limit of the number of any species which may be taken by any one
person in any one season or year, and may be issued in such a
manner that only a certain number may be used in any one
management area, or that one tag may be used in several
management areas, as designated by the Commission.
2. The Commission shall designate the number of tags for any
species which may be obtained by any one person, and it is unlawful
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
for any person to obtain tags for the person’s use in excess of this
number. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 502.145 and the
regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to subsection [9] 8
of NRS 501.181, it is unlawful for any person to use or possess tags
issued to any other person, or to transfer or give tags issued to him
or her to any other person.
Sec. 11. NRS 503.590 is hereby amended to read as follows:
503.590 1. [Except as otherwise provided in this section, a] A
person may maintain a noncommercial collection of legally obtained
live wildlife if:
(a) Such a collection is not maintained for public display nor as
a part of or adjunct to any commercial establishment; and
(b) The wildlife contained in such a collection is of a species
which may be possessed in accordance with regulations adopted by
the Commission pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 504.295.
2. The Commission may adopt reasonable regulations
establishing minimum standards for the fencing or containment of
any collection of wildlife.
[3. The provisions of this section do not apply to alternative
livestock and products made therefrom.]
Sec. 12. NRS 503.597 is hereby amended to read as follows:
503.597 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is
unlawful, except by the written consent and approval of the
Department, for any person at any time to receive, bring or have
brought or shipped into this State, or remove from one stream or
body of water in this State to any other, or from one portion of the
State to any other, or to any other state, any aquatic life or wildlife,
or any spawn, eggs or young of any of them.
2. The Department shall require an applicant to conduct an
investigation to confirm that such an introduction or removal will
not be detrimental to the wildlife or the habitat of wildlife in this
State. Written consent and approval of the Department may be given
only if the results of the investigation prove that the introduction,
removal or importation will not be detrimental to existing aquatic
life or wildlife, or any spawn, eggs or young of any of them.
3. The Commission may through appropriate regulation
provide for the inspection of such introduced or removed creatures
and the inspection fees therefor.
4. The Commission may adopt regulations to prohibit the
importation, transportation or possession of any species of wildlife
which the Commission deems to be detrimental to the wildlife or the
habitat of the wildlife in this State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
5. A person who knowingly or intentionally introduces, causes
to be introduced or attempts to introduce an aquatic invasive species
or injurious aquatic species into any waters of this State is guilty of:
(a) For a first offense, a misdemeanor; and
(b) For any subsequent offense, a category E felony and shall be
punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
6. A court before whom a defendant is convicted of a violation
of subsection 5 shall, for each violation, order the defendant to pay a
civil penalty of at least $25,000 but not more than $250,000. The
money must be deposited into the Wildlife Account in the State
General Fund and used to:
(a) Remove the aquatic invasive species or injurious aquatic
species;
(b) Reintroduce any game fish or other aquatic wildlife
destroyed by the aquatic invasive species or injurious aquatic
species;
(c) Restore any habitat destroyed by the aquatic invasive species
or injurious aquatic species;
(d) Repair any other damage done to the waters of this State by
the introduction of the aquatic invasive species or injurious aquatic
species; and
(e) Defray any other costs incurred by the Department because
of the introduction of the aquatic invasive species or injurious
aquatic species.
7. The provisions of this section do not apply to [:
(a) Alternative livestock and products made therefrom; or
(b) The] the introduction of any species by the Department for
sport fishing or other wildlife management programs.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Aquatic invasive species” means an aquatic species which
is exotic or not native to this State and which the Commission has
determined to be detrimental to aquatic life, water resources or
infrastructure for providing water in this State.
(b) “Injurious aquatic species” means an aquatic species which
the Commission has determined to be a threat to sensitive,
threatened or endangered aquatic species or game fish or to the
habitat of sensitive, threatened or endangered aquatic species or
game fish by any means, including, without limitation:
(1) Predation;
(2) Parasitism;
(3) Interbreeding; or
(4) The transmission of disease.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
Sec. 13. NRS 504.185 is hereby amended to read as follows:
504.185 The provisions of this section and NRS 504.155 and
504.165 do not apply to [:
1. Alternative livestock; or
2. Game] game mammals not native to this State [,
] that are held in captivity for purposes other than as required by
the Department.
Sec. 14. NRS 504.245 is hereby amended to read as follows:
504.245 1. Any species of wildlife [, including alternative
livestock,] that:
(a) Is released from confinement without the prior written
authorization of the Department; or
(b) Escapes from the possessor’s control,
 may be captured, seized or destroyed by the Department if the
Department determines that such actions are necessary to protect
wildlife and the habitat of wildlife in this State.
2. The owner or possessor of such wildlife:
(a) Shall report its escape immediately after receiving
knowledge of the escape; and
(b) Is liable for the costs incurred by the Department to capture,
maintain and dispose of the wildlife and for any damage caused by
the wildlife.
3. The Department is not liable for any damage to wildlife, or
caused by wildlife, in carrying out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 15. NRS 504.295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
504.295 1. Except as otherwise provided in [this section and]
NRS 503.590, or unless otherwise specified by a regulation adopted
by the Commission, no person may:
(a) Possess any live wildlife unless the person is licensed by the
Department to do so.
(b) Capture live wildlife in this State to stock a commercial or
noncommercial wildlife facility.
(c) Possess or release from confinement any mammal for the
purposes of hunting.
2. The Commission shall adopt regulations for the possession
of live wildlife. The regulations must set forth the species of wildlife
which may be possessed and propagated, and provide for the
inspection by the Department of any related facilities.
3. In accordance with the regulations of the Commission, the
Department may issue commercial and noncommercial licenses for
the possession of live wildlife upon receipt of the applicable fee.
[4. The provisions of this section do not apply to alternative
livestock and products made therefrom.]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. NRS 564.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
564.010 As used in this chapter:
1. “Animals” means:
(a) All cattle or animals of the bovine species.
(b) All horses, mules, burros and asses or animals of the equine
species.
(c) All swine or animals of the porcine species.
(d) All sheep and goats.
[(e) Alternative livestock as defined in NRS 501.003.]
2. “Department” means the State Department of Agriculture.
3. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
Sec. 18. NRS 565.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
565.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Agricultural police officer” means a person appointed by
the Director pursuant to NRS 561.225 who has the powers of a
peace officer pursuant to NRS 289.290.
2. “Animals” means:
(a) All cattle or animals of the bovine species except dairy breed
calves under the age of 1 month.
(b) All horses, mules, burros and asses or animals of the equine
species.
(c) All swine or animals of the porcine species.
[(d) Alternative livestock as defined in NRS 501.003.]
3. “Brand inspection” means a careful visual examination of
each animal offered for such inspection and a visual examination of
any brands, marks or other characteristics thereon.
4. “Department” means the State Department of Agriculture.
5. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
Sec. 19. NRS 569.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
569.005 As used in NRS 569.005 to 569.130, inclusive, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in
NRS [569.006] 569.0065 to 569.0085, inclusive, have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 20. NRS 569.0085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
569.0085 “Livestock” means:
1. All cattle or animals of the bovine species;
2. All horses, mules, burros and asses or animals of the equine
species;
3. All swine or animals of the porcine species;
4. All goats or animals of the caprine species;
5. All sheep or animals of the ovine species; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
6. All poultry or domesticated fowl or birds . [; and
7. All alternative livestock.]
Sec. 21. NRS 571.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
571.015 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS [571.016] 571.017 to
571.023, inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 22. NRS 571.022 is hereby amended to read as follows:
571.022 “Livestock” means:
1. All cattle or animals of the bovine species.
2. All horses, mules, burros and asses or animals of the equine
species.
3. All swine or animals of the porcine species.
4. All goats or animals of the caprine species.
5. All sheep or animals of the ovine species.
6. All poultry or domesticated fowl or birds.
7. All dogs, cats or other animals domesticated or under the
restraint or control of humans.
[8. All alternative livestock.]
Sec. 23. NRS 571.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
571.210 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
person, or the person’s agent or employee may bring into this State
any animal not under special quarantine by the State of Nevada, the
Federal Government, or the state, territory or district of origin in
compliance with regulations adopted by the State Quarantine
Officer.
2. Notice that an animal is in transit is not required unless the
animal remains in this State, or is to be unloaded in this State to feed
and rest for longer than 48 hours.
3. A person, or the person’s agent or employee shall not bring
any animal into this State unless he or she has obtained a health
certificate showing that the animal is free from contagious,
infectious or parasitic diseases or exposure thereto. This requirement
does not apply to any animal whose accustomed range is on both
sides of the Nevada state line and which is being moved from one
portion to another of the accustomed range merely for pasturing and
grazing thereon. The State Quarantine Officer shall adopt
regulations concerning the form of the certificate.
4. A person, or the person’s agent or employee shall not:
(a) Alter a health certificate; or
(b) Divert any animal from the destination described on the
health certificate without notifying the State Quarantine Officer
within 72 hours after the diversion of the animal.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
5. To protect this State from the effects of chronic wasting
disease, a person, or the person’s agent or employee shall not
knowingly bring into this State any live:
(a) Elk (Cervus elaphus);
(b) Mule deer (Odocoileus hemionus);
(c) White-tailed deer (Odocoileus virginianus);
(d) Moose (Alces alces); or
(e) [Alternative livestock, unless in accordance with a permit
obtained pursuant to NRS 576.129; or
(f)] Other animal that the State Quarantine Officer has, by
regulation, declared to be susceptible to chronic wasting disease and
prohibited from importation into this State.
6. Any animal knowingly brought into this State in violation of
this section may be seized, destroyed or sent out of this State by the
State Quarantine Officer within 48 hours. The expense of seizing,
destroying or removing the animal must be paid by the owner or the
owner’s agent in charge of the animal and the expense is a lien on
the animal, unless it was destroyed, until paid.
Sec. 24. NRS 573.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
573.010 As used in this chapter:
1. “Annual sale of livestock” means any sale of livestock:
(a) To which any member of the public may consign livestock
for sale or exchange through public bidding at the sale of the
livestock; and
(b) Which is conducted for not more than 2 consecutive days
during a calendar year.
2. “Consignor” means any person consigning, shipping or
delivering livestock to a public livestock auction for sale, resale or
exchange.
3. “Department” means the State Department of Agriculture.
4. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
5. “Livestock” means [:
(a) Cattle,] cattle, sheep, goats, horses, mules, asses, burros,
swine or poultry . [; and
(b) Alternative livestock as defined in NRS 501.003.]
6. “Operator of a public livestock auction” means any person
holding, conducting or carrying on a public livestock auction.
7. “Public livestock auction” means any sale or exchange of
livestock held by any person at an established place of business or
premises where the livestock is assembled for sale or exchange, and
is exchanged or sold at auction or upon a commission basis at
regular or irregular intervals. The term does not include an annual
sale of livestock.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
Sec. 25. NRS 576.129 is hereby amended to read as follows:
576.129 [1. It] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
571.210, it is unlawful for any person to import, possess or
propagate any alternative livestock . [unless the person first obtains
from the State Board of Agriculture a permit that authorizes the
person to do so.
2. The State Board of Agriculture shall adopt regulations for
the importation, possession and propagation of alternative livestock.
The regulations must set forth requirements for:
(a) Facilities used to confine alternative livestock, including
minimum requirements for fencing to prevent the escape of
alternative livestock.
(b) The genetic testing of alternative livestock.
(c) Keeping and maintaining records related to the importation,
transfer, possession and propagation of alternative livestock.
(d) Identifying and marking alternative livestock.
(e) Marketing alternative livestock.
(f) The filing of any bonds which may be required by the State
Board of Agriculture.
3. In adopting the regulations required by subsection 2, the
State Board of Agriculture shall consult with the Department of
Wildlife and the Board of Wildlife Commissioners concerning the
provisions that are necessary to protect wildlife in this state and in
the areas designated as areas of special concern by the Board of
Wildlife Commissioners pursuant to NRS 501.181.
4. The State Board of Agriculture shall establish by regulation
a schedule of fees required to be paid for a permit issued pursuant to
this section. The fees established must not exceed the approximate
cost to the Board of carrying out the provisions of this section.]
Sec. 26. Any regulations adopted by the State Board of
Agriculture pursuant to NRS 576.129, as that section existed before
the effective date of section 25 of this act, are void. The Legislative
Counsel shall remove those regulations from the Nevada
Administrative Code as soon as practicable after the effective date
of this section.
Sec. 27. NRS 503.242, 569.006, 571.016 and 576.131 are
hereby repealed.
Sec. 28. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)